Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 42. Program to Encourage Growth in Mississippi Agribusiness Industry

§ 69-42-1.
Definitions; development and implementation of program; purpose of program; annual report.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agribusiness” means any agricultural, aquacultural, horticultural, manufacturing, research and development or processing enterprise or enterprises.

“Farmer” means a resident of Mississippi who engages or wishes to engage in the commercial production of crops on land in Mississippi. The term shall include individuals, partnerships and corporations.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall develop and implement a program to stimulate growth in the agricultural industry for agribusiness concerns and farmers.

The program developed and implemented by the Mississippi Development Authority under this section shall:

Increase the availability of financial assistance available to agribusiness concerns and farmers;

Provide incentives for agribusiness concerns and farmers which will encourage growth in the Mississippi agricultural industry;

Assist new agribusiness concerns and farmers in developing and implementing business plans;

Develop methods for increasing markets for the goods and services of agribusiness concerns and farmers;

Work with public and private entities in disseminating information about public and private programs that benefit agribusiness concerns and farmers; and

Identify sources of financial assistance available to agribusiness concerns and farmers and assist agribusiness concerns and farmers with the preparation of applications for assistance from public and private sources.

(a) The Mississippi Development Authority shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, regarding the impact of the program created under this section on the agribusiness industry in Mississippi.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, with recommendations for any legislation necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 52, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).